Illinois, session 104th, HB5133.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Local 5Government Essential Services Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act, "emergency 7medical services" has the meaning given to the term "Emergency 8Medical Services EMS Systems" under Section 3.20 of the 9Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Systems Act. 10    Section 10. Essential service. Emergency medical services 11shall be deemed an essential service in the State. 12    Section 15. Local government obligations. The governing 13body of each municipality and county in the State shall ensure 14the availability of emergency medical services to provide for 15the needs of its population. The governing body of each 16municipality and county may provide emergency medical services 17by:18        (1) providing a license or franchise to a private 19    company;20        (2) contracting with a public, private, or nonprofit 21    entity for emergency medical services;  HB5133- 2 -LRB104 20093 RTM 33544 b1        (3) entering into agreements with other units of local 2    government; or3        (4) entering into agreements with hospitals, clinics, 4    or any medical facility.